Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6714XS (1) 91 dg/ko S.F. 2236 Section 1. Section 135C.7A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. The department shall not approve the 3 change of ownership of a previously licensed nursing facility 4 if the person seeking to obtain ownership of the nursing 5 facility is any of the following: 6 a. A private equity fund as defined in 12 U.S.C. 7 Â§1851(h)(2), as amended. 8 b. Majority owned by a private equity fund. 9 c. An affiliate of a private equity fund. 10 d. A real estate investment trust as defined in 26 U.S.C. 11 Â§856(a), as amended. 12 e. Majority owned by a real estate investment trust. 13 f. An affiliate of a real estate investment trust. 14